Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2684.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6582HV (1) 91 mb/md H.F. 2684 Section 1. Section 257.10, subsection 9, paragraph d, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 d. For the budget year beginning July 1, 2010, and 3 succeeding budget years, the use of the funds calculated under 4 this subsection or available for use as provided in subsection 5 10 , paragraph âdâ , subsection 12 , paragraph âdâ , or section 6 257.46, subsection 3 , shall be distributed to teachers pursuant 7 to section 284.3A and shall comply with the requirements of 8 chapter 284 related to such distribution under section 284.3A . 9 However, for budget years beginning on or after July 1, 2026, 10 amounts calculated under this subsection that are attributable 11 to resident pupils participating in the education savings 12 account program under section 257.11B may be used for any 13 school general fund purpose. 14 Sec. 2. Section 257.10, subsection 10, paragraph d, Code 15 2026, is amended to read as follows: 16 d. The use of the funds calculated under this subsection 17 and any amount designated for professional development purposes 18 from the school districtâs flexibility account under section 19 298A.2, subsection 2 , shall comply with the requirements 20 of chapter 284 . However, for budget years beginning on or 21 after July 1, 2026, amounts calculated under this subsection 22 that are attributable to resident pupils participating in 23 the education savings account program under section 257.11B 24 may be used for any school general fund purpose. If all 25 professional development requirements of chapter 284 are met 26 and funds received under this subsection remain unexpended 27 and unobligated at the end of a fiscal year beginning on or 28 after July 1, 2017, the school district may transfer all or a 29 portion of such unexpended and unobligated funds for deposit 30 in the school districtâs flexibility account established under 31 section 298A.2, subsection 2 . At the end of a fiscal year 32 beginning on or after July 1, 2022, the school district may 33 use all or a portion of funds under this subsection for the 34 purposes authorized under subsection 9 , paragraph âdâ . At the 35 -1- LSB 6582HV (1) 91 mb/md 1/ 3 H.F. 2684 end of a fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2024, the 1 school district may use all or a portion of funds under this 2 subsection for any trainings required as a condition for a 3 school employee to carry a weapon at the school during school 4 hours. 5 Sec. 3. Section 257.10, subsection 12, paragraph d, Code 6 2026, is amended to read as follows: 7 d. Except as otherwise allowed under this paragraph, 8 for the budget year beginning July 1, 2014, and succeeding 9 budget years, the use of the funds calculated under this 10 subsection shall comply with the requirements of chapter 284 11 and shall be distributed to teachers pursuant to section 12 284.15 . The funds shall be used only to increase the payment 13 for a teacher assigned to a leadership role pursuant to a 14 framework or comparable system approved pursuant to section 15 284.15 ; to increase the percentages of teachers assigned to 16 leadership roles; to increase the minimum teacher starting 17 salary to the amount provided in section 284.15, subsection 2 , 18 paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (1); to cover the costs for the 19 time mentor and lead teachers are not providing instruction 20 to students in a classroom; for coverage of a classroom when 21 an initial or career teacher is observing or co-teaching with 22 a teacher assigned to a leadership role; for professional 23 development time to learn best practices associated with 24 the career pathways leadership process; and for other costs 25 associated with a framework or comparable system approved by 26 the department of education under section 284.15 with the goals 27 of improving instruction and elevating the quality of teaching 28 and student learning. However, for budget years beginning on 29 or after July 1, 2026, amounts calculated under this subsection 30 that are attributable to resident pupils participating in the 31 education savings account program under section 257.11B may be 32 used for any school general fund purpose. If all requirements 33 for the school district for the use of funds calculated 34 under this subsection are met and funds received under this 35 -2- LSB 6582HV (1) 91 mb/md 2/ 3 H.F. 2684 subsection remain unexpended and unobligated at the end of a 1 fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2020, the school 2 district may transfer all or a portion of such unexpended 3 and unobligated funds for deposit in the school districtâs 4 flexibility account established under section 298A.2, 5 subsection 2 . At the end of a fiscal year beginning on or after 6 July 1, 2022, school districts may use all or a portion of 7 funds under this subsection for the purposes authorized under 8 subsection 9 , paragraph âdâ , and, notwithstanding any provision 9 of law to the contrary, school districts shall not be required 10 to participate in or comply with section 284.15 in order to 11 continue to receive funding under this subsection . 12